Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Chapter 37. Uniform Alcoholism and Intoxication Treatment Act.
Sec. 47.37.170.
Treatment and services for intoxicated persons and persons incapacitated by alcohol or drugs.

An intoxicated person may come voluntarily to an approved public treatment facility for emergency treatment. A person who appears to be intoxicated in a public place and to be in need of help or a person who appears to be intoxicated in or upon licensed premises where intoxicating liquors are sold or consumed who refuses to leave upon being requested to leave by the owner, an employee, or a peace officer may be taken into protective custody and assisted by a peace officer or a member of the emergency service patrol to the person’s home, an approved public treatment facility, an approved private treatment facility, or another appropriate health facility. If all of the preceding facilities, including the person’s home, are determined to be unavailable, a person taken into protective custody and assisted under this subsection may be taken to a state or municipal detention facility in the area. However, emergency protective custody under this subsection may not include placement of a minor in a jail or secure facility.

A person who appears to be incapacitated by alcohol or drugs in a public place shall be taken into protective custody by a peace officer or a member of the emergency service patrol and immediately brought to an approved public treatment facility, an approved private treatment facility, or another appropriate health facility or service for emergency medical treatment. If no treatment facility or emergency medical service is available, a person who appears to be incapacitated by alcohol or drugs in a public place shall be taken to a state or municipal detention facility in the area if that appears necessary for the protection of the person’s health or safety. However, emergency protective custody under this subsection may not include placement of a minor in a jail or secure facility.

A person who voluntarily appears or is brought to an approved public treatment facility shall be examined by a licensed physician or other qualified health practitioner as soon as possible. The department shall, by regulation, determine which health practitioners may be authorized to perform the examination. After the examination, the person may be admitted as a patient or referred to another health facility. The approved public treatment facility which refers the person shall arrange for transportation.

A person who, after medical examination at an approved private treatment facility, or another appropriate health facility or service for emergency medical treatment, is found to be incapacitated by alcohol or drugs at the time of admission or to have become incapacitated by alcohol or drugs at any time after admission, may not be detained at a facility after the person is no longer incapacitated by alcohol or drugs. A person may not be detained at a facility if the person remains incapacitated by alcohol for more than 48 hours after admission as a patient. A person may consent to remain in the facility as long as the physician in charge considers it appropriate.

A person who is not admitted to an approved public treatment facility, is not referred to another health facility, and has no funds, may be taken to the person’s home, if any. If the person has no home, the approved public treatment facility shall assist the person in obtaining shelter.

If a patient is admitted to an approved public treatment facility, family or next of kin shall be promptly notified. If an adult patient who is not incapacitated by alcohol or drugs requests that there be no notification of next of kin, the request shall be granted.

A person may not bring an action for damages based on the decision under this section to take or not to take an intoxicated person or a person incapacitated by alcohol or drugs into protective custody, unless the action is for damages caused by gross negligence or intentional misconduct.

If the physician in charge of the approved public treatment facility determines it is for the patient’s benefit, an attempt shall be made to encourage the patient to submit to further diagnosis and appropriate voluntary treatment.

A person taken to a detention facility under (a) or (b) of this section may be detained only (1) until a treatment facility or emergency medical service is made available, (2) until the person is no longer intoxicated or incapacitated by alcohol or drugs, or (3) for a maximum period of 12 hours, whichever occurs first. A detaining officer or a detention facility official may release a person who is detained under (a) or (b) of this section at any time to the custody of a responsible adult. A peace officer or a member of the emergency service patrol, in detaining a person under (a) or (b) of this section and in taking the person to a treatment facility, an emergency medical service, or a detention facility, is taking the person into protective custody and the officer or patrol member shall make reasonable efforts to provide for and protect the health and safety of the detainee. In taking a person into protective custody under (a) and (b) of this section, a detaining officer, a member of the emergency service patrol, or a detention facility official may take reasonable steps for self-protection, including a full protective search of the person of a detainee. Protective custody under (a) and (b) of this section does not constitute an arrest and no entry or other record may be made to indicate that the person detained has been arrested or charged with a crime, except that a confidential record may be made that is necessary for the administrative purposes of the facility to which the person has been taken or that is necessary for statistical purposes where the person’s name may not be disclosed.

[Repealed, § 21 ch 66 SLA 1996.]

In this section, “minor” means an individual who is under 18 years of age.

History.

(§ 1 ch 207 SLA 1972; am §§ 1 — 4 ch 101 SLA 1976; am § 2 ch 68 SLA 1989; am § 1 ch 62 SLA 1990; am §§ 1 — 5, 21 ch 66 SLA 1996; am §§ 5 — 7 ch 95 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 47.37.110. Renumbered in 1972.

Cross references. —

For legislative intent in connection with the 1989 amendment of (g) of this section, see § 1, ch. 68, SLA 1989 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For standards for facilities and programs, see 7 AAC 29, art. 1.

For admission to adult correctional facilities, see 22 AAC 5, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2004 amendment, effective June 26, 2004, added the last sentence of subsection (a) and the last sentence of subsection (b), added subsection (k), and made stylistic changes.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 3, ch. 68, SLA 1989 provides that the 1989 amendment of (g) of this section “applies to causes of action that accrue on or after May 31, 1989.”

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 95, SLA 2004 (SB 340), proposing legislation conforming the state’s juvenile detention laws with federal requirements set out in the Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention Act of 2003, see 2004 Senate Journal 2185.

Sec. 47.37.180.
Emergency commitment.

An intoxicated person who (1) has threatened, attempted to inflict, or inflicted physical harm on another or is likely to inflict physical harm on another unless committed, or (2) is incapacitated by alcohol or drugs, may be committed to an approved public treatment facility for emergency treatment. A refusal to undergo treatment does not constitute evidence of lack of judgment as to the need for treatment.

The certifying physician, physician assistant, advanced practice registered nurse, spouse, guardian, or relative of the person to be committed, or any other responsible person, may make a written application for commitment under this section, directed to the administrator of the approved public treatment facility. The application must state facts to support the need for emergency treatment and be accompanied by a physician’s, physician assistant’s, or advanced practice registered nurse’s certificate supporting the need for emergency treatment and stating that the physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse has examined the person sought to be committed within two days before the certificate’s date.

Upon approval of the application by the administrator in charge of the facility, the person may be brought to the facility by a peace officer, a health officer, a member of the emergency service patrol, the applicant for commitment, the patient’s spouse, the patient’s guardian, or any other interested person. The person shall be retained at the facility to which the person was admitted, or transferred to another appropriate public or private treatment facility, until discharged under (e) of this section. However, a person may not be detained under this section for more than 48 hours unless a district or superior court judge has reviewed and approved the commitment application.

The administrator in charge of an approved public treatment facility may refuse an application if in the administrator’s opinion the application and certificate fail to sustain the grounds for commitment.

When on the advice of the medical staff the administrator determines that the grounds for commitment no longer exist, the administrator shall discharge a person committed under this section. A person committed under this section may not be detained in a treatment facility for more than five days. If a petition for involuntary commitment under AS

47.37.190

has been filed within the five days and the administrator in charge of an approved public treatment facility finds that grounds for emergency commitment still exist, the administrator may detain the person until the petition has been heard and determined, but no longer than 10 days after filing the petition.

A copy of the written application for commitment and of the physician’s, physician assistant’s, or advanced practice registered nurse’s certificate, and a written explanation of the person’s right to legal counsel, shall be given to the person within 24 hours after commitment by the administrator, who shall provide a reasonable opportunity for the person to consult with legal counsel.

The administrator of an approved public treatment facility may accept an application for commitment under this section from a health facility and may authorize the health facility to hold the person who is the subject of the commitment petition at the health facility as long as medically necessary, before transferring the person to the approved public treatment facility. An administrator who accepts an application for commitment from a health facility shall comply with the provisions of (c) — (f) of this section if the person being committed is held for longer than 48 hours from the time the administrator accepts the application for commitment under this subsection. A person committed under this subsection shall be transported from the health facility to the approved public treatment facility as soon as the person is discharged from the health facility. If the person being committed under this subsection is physically present at the health facility at the time an application for extension of detention is filed under (c) of this section or is physically present at the health facility when a petition for involuntary commitment is filed under (e) of this section, the administrator accepting the application for commitment under this subsection shall inform the court of where the person being committed is being held and when the person being committed is expected to be capable of being transferred to the approved public treatment facility.

History.

(§ 1 ch 207 SLA 1972; am §§ 6, 7 ch 66 SLA 1996; am §§ 1, 2 ch 72 SLA 2001; am §§ 56, 57 ch 33 SLA 2016)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

47.37.120

. Renumbered in 1972.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 7, 2016, in (b), substituted “practice registered nurse” for “nurse practitioner” in two places, and substituted “practice registered nurse’s” for “nurse practitioner’s”; in (f), substituted “practice registered nurse’s” for “nurse practitioner’s”.

Sec. 47.37.190.
Involuntary commitment.

A spouse or guardian, a relative, the certifying physician, physician assistant, advanced practice registered nurse, or the administrator in charge of an approved public treatment facility may petition the court for a 30-day involuntary commitment order. The petition must allege that the person is an alcoholic or drug abuser who (1) has threatened, attempted to inflict, or inflicted physical harm on another and that unless committed is likely to inflict physical harm on another; or (2) is incapacitated by alcohol or drugs. A refusal to undergo treatment does not constitute evidence of lack of judgment as to the need for treatment. The petition must be accompanied by a certificate of a licensed physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse who has examined the person within two days before submission of the petition, unless the person whose commitment is sought has refused to submit to a medical examination, in which case the fact of refusal must be alleged in the petition. The certificate must set out the physician’s, physician assistant’s, or advanced practice registered nurse’s findings of the examination in support of the allegations of the petition.

After the petition is filed, the court shall fix a date for a hearing no later than 10 days after the date the petition was filed. A copy of the petition and of the notice of the hearing, including the date fixed by the court, shall be served on

the petitioner;

the person whose commitment is sought or the person’s guardian, if any;

the attorney representing the person whose commitment is sought;

the administrator in charge of the approved public or private treatment facility in which the committed person has been committed for emergency care; and

any other person the court considers appropriate.

A person who is the subject of a petition filed under this section does not have the right to a jury.

History.

(§ 1 ch 207 SLA 1972; am § 7 ch 150 SLA 1980; am §§ 8 — 10 ch 66 SLA 1996; am § 3 ch 72 SLA 2001; am § 58 ch 33 SLA 2016)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

47.37.130

. Renumbered in 1972.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 7, 2016, in (a), substituted “practice registered nurse” for “nurse practitioner” in two places and substituted “practice registered nurse’s” for “nurse practitioner’s”.

Collateral references. —

Necessity and sufficiency of statements informing one under investigation for involuntary commitment of right to remain silent. 23 ALR4th 563.

Sec. 47.37.200.
Hearing, commitment, facility, discharge, transfer, and rights.

At the hearing for a 30-day commitment required under AS

47.37.190(b)

, the court shall hear all relevant testimony, including, if possible, the testimony of at least one person who has examined the person whose commitment is sought under AS

47.37.180(b)

or

47.37.190(a)

. The person whose commitment is sought shall be present unless the court believes that being present is likely to be injurious to the person, in which case the court may conduct the hearing telephonically. The court may examine the person in open court, or, if advisable, examine the person out of court. If the person has refused to be examined under AS

47.37.180(b)

or

47.37.190(a)

, the person shall be given an opportunity to request examination by a court-appointed licensed physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse. If the person fails to request a medical examination and there is sufficient evidence to believe that the allegations of the petition are true, or, if the court believes that more medical evidence is necessary, the court may issue a temporary order committing the person to a private or public facility for a period of not more than five days for purposes of a diagnostic examination.

If after hearing all relevant evidence, including the results of any diagnostic examination by the private or public facility, the court finds that grounds for involuntary commitment have been clearly established, the court shall issue an order of 30-day commitment to the private or public facility.

A person committed for a 30-day period shall remain in the custody of a private or public facility for treatment for a period of not more than 30 days. At the end of the 30-day period, the person shall be automatically discharged unless the director of the approved public facility or approved private facility, before the expiration of the period, files a petition for recommitment under AS

47.37.205

.

A private or public facility must be capable of providing adequate and appropriate treatment for a person in its custody. A public facility may transfer a person in its custody from one approved public treatment facility to another if the transfer is medically advisable.

A person committed to the custody of an approved public facility or an approved private facility shall be discharged at any time before the end of the period for which the person has been committed if either of the following conditions is met:

further treatment is not likely to bring about significant improvement in the person’s condition; or

treatment is no longer adequate or appropriate.

The court shall inform the person whose commitment or recommitment is sought of the right to contest the petition, to be represented by counsel at every stage of the proceedings relating to commitment and recommitment, to have counsel appointed by the court or provided by the court, if the person is unable to obtain counsel, and of the right to a jury trial if recommitment is sought under AS

47.37.205

. The person whose commitment or recommitment is sought shall be informed of the right to be examined by a licensed physician of the person’s choice. If the person is unable to obtain a licensed physician and requests examination by a physician, the court shall appoint a licensed physician for the examination.

If a private treatment facility agrees with the request of a competent patient or the patient’s parent, adult sibling, adult child, or guardian to accept the patient for treatment, the administrator of the public treatment facility shall transfer the patient to the private treatment facility.

A person committed under this chapter may at any time seek discharge from commitment by writ of habeas corpus under AS 12.75.

History.

(§ 1 ch 207 SLA 1972; am §§ 8 — 12 ch 150 SLA 1980; am E.O. No. 76 §§ 11 — 13 (1990); am § 11 ch 66 SLA 1996; am § 4 ch 72 SLA 2001; am § 59 ch 33 SLA 2016)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

47.37.140

. Renumbered in 1972.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 7, 2016, in (a), substituted “practice registered nurse” for “nurse practitioner”.

Sec. 47.37.205.
Procedure for recommitment following 30-day commitment.

At any time during a person’s 30-day commitment, the director of an approved public facility or approved private facility may file with the court a petition for a 180-day commitment of that person. The petition must include all material required under AS

47.37.190(a)

except that references to “30 days” shall be read as “180 days” and must allege that the person continues to be an alcoholic or drug abuser who is incapacitated by alcohol or drugs, or who continues to be at risk of serious physical harm or illness.

Upon the filing of a petition for recommitment under (a) of this section, the court shall fix a date for hearing no later than 10 days after the date the petition was filed. A copy of the petition and of the notice of hearing, including the date fixed by the court, shall be served on

the petitioner;

the person whose recommitment is sought or the person’s guardian, if any;

the attorney representing the person whose recommitment is sought;

the original petitioner under AS

47.37.190(a)

, if different from the petitioner for recommitment;

any other person the court considers appropriate.

If, not less than two days before the date set for a recommitment hearing under (a) of this section, the person being recommitted or the person’s counsel or advisor files a written request with the court, the court shall summon and impanel a jury of six residents of the judicial district to hear and consider evidence concerning the condition of the person being recommitted.

At the hearing regarding recommitment for a 180-day period, the court or jury shall proceed as provided in AS

47.37.200(a)

and (b).

The provisions of AS

47.37.200(c)

— (h) shall apply equally to periods of recommitment under this section, except that references to “30 days” shall be read as “180 days.”

History.

(§ 12 ch 66 SLA 1996)

Sec. 47.37.207.
Unauthorized absences: return to facility.

When a person committed under AS

47.37.190

—

47.37.205

is absent from a treatment facility without authorization, the administrator, or that person’s designee, may contact peace officers who shall take the person into custody and return the respondent to the treatment facility.

History.

(§ 13 ch 66 SLA 1996)

Sec. 47.37.210.
Records of alcoholics, drug abusers, and intoxicated persons.

Except as required by AS

28.35.030(d)

, the registration and other records of treatment facilities shall remain confidential and are privileged to the patient.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, the department may make available information from patients’ records for purposes of research into the causes and treatment of alcoholism or drug abuse. Information may not disclose a patient’s name.

History.

(§ 1 ch 207 SLA 1972; am § 4 ch 152 SLA 1978; am E.O. No. 76 § 14 (1990); am § 14 ch 66 SLA 1996; am E.O. No. 108 § 55 (2003))

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

47.37.150

. Renumbered in 1972.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2003 amendment, effective July 1, 2003, substituted “department” for “director” in subsection (b).

Sec. 47.37.220.
Visitation and communication with patients.

Patients in any approved treatment facility under this chapter shall be granted reasonable opportunities for adequate consultation with counsel, and for continuing contact with family and friends including the use of telephone facilities, consistent with an effective treatment program.

Mail or other communication to or from a patient in any approved treatment facility may not be intercepted, read, or censored.

History.

(§ 1 ch 207 SLA 1972)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

47.37.160

. Renumbered in 1972.

Sec. 47.37.230.
Establishment of emergency service patrol.

Cities and boroughs may establish emergency service patrols. An emergency service patrol consists of persons trained to give assistance in public places to persons who are intoxicated. Members of an emergency service patrol shall be capable of providing first aid in emergency situations and shall be capable of transporting intoxicated persons to their homes and to and from public treatment facilities.

The department shall adopt regulations for the establishment, training, and conduct of emergency service patrols.

History.

(§ 1 ch 207 SLA 1972; am § 13 ch 150 SLA 1980; am E.O. No. 76 § 15 (1990); am E.O. No. 108 § 56 (2003))

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

47.37.170

. Renumbered in 1972.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2003 amendment, effective July 1, 2003, substituted “department” for “director” in subsection (b).

Sec. 47.37.235.
Limitations on liability; bad faith application a felony.

Except as provided under (b) of this section, a person acting in good faith upon either actual knowledge or reliable information who takes a person into protective custody or detains a person under AS

47.37.170

—

47.37.180

, or who petitions for commitment under AS

47.37.180

—

47.37.205

, is not subject to civil or criminal liability.

The following persons may not be held civilly or criminally liable for detaining or failing to detain a person under AS

47.37.170

—

47.37.270

or for releasing a person under AS

47.37.170

—

47.37.270

at or before the end of the period for which the person was admitted or committed for protective custody or treatment if the persons have performed their duties in good faith and without gross negligence:

an officer of an approved public or private treatment facility;

the administrator of an approved public or private treatment facility, and the staff of an approved public or private treatment facility;

a public official performing functions necessary to the administration of AS 47.37.170 — 47.37.270;

a peace officer or other person responsible for detaining or transporting a person under AS 47.37.170 — 47.37.270.

A person who knowingly initiates an involuntary commitment petition under AS

47.37.180

—

47.37.205

without having good cause to believe that the other person is an alcoholic or drug abuser and is incapacitated or at risk of serious physical harm or illness if not treated is guilty of a class C felony.

History.

(§ 15 ch 66 SLA 1996)

Sec. 47.37.240.
Payment for treatment.

A patient in an approved treatment facility, or the person obligated to provide for the cost of treatment of a person committed under this chapter, is liable to the public or private facility for the cost of maintenance and treatment of the patient in accordance with rates established by the department.

The department shall adopt regulations governing financial ability that take into consideration the income, savings, and other personal and real property of the person liable for the cost and maintenance of the patient.

History.

(§ 1 ch 207 SLA 1972; am § 14 ch 150 SLA 1980; am E.O. No. 76 § 16 (1990); am E.O. No. 108 § 57 (2003))

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

47.37.180

. Renumbered in 1972.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2003 amendment, effective July 1, 2003, substituted “department” for “director” in one place in subsections (a) and (b).

Sec. 47.37.245.
Wages of patients.

A participant in a residential drug abuse or alcoholism treatment program may be paid wages for work therapy. The payment of wages for work therapy by a drug or alcoholism treatment program shall be considered an allowable cost under the department’s regulations governing costs a grantee may pay with money received from a grant.

No part of the wage earned by the patient worker may be deducted for the cost of room, board, or services. The program, however, after the payment of wages, may assess and collect the reasonable cost of treatment according to rates established under AS

47.37.240

, and on the same basis it assesses and collects from nonworking patients.

Wages earned by the patient worker may be held in trust by the program for the benefit of the patient, and, except as provided in (d) of this section, may be disbursed by the program only with the patient’s consent

for the support of the patient’s dependents;

to pay a civil judgment;

for the purchase of gifts, clothing, and items of personal use;

to pay restitution or a fine;

for other purposes considered appropriate by the treatment program.

Wages earned by the patient worker may be disbursed without the patient’s consent in accordance with a final court order.

History.

(§ 2 ch 58 SLA 1983)

Sec. 47.37.250.
Effect of chapter on other laws.

Nothing in this chapter affects a statute, ordinance, or regulation relating to

drunken driving, driving under the influence of alcohol, or other similar offenses involving alcohol and the operation of a vehicle, aircraft, boat, machinery, or other equipment;

the sale, purchase, dispensation, possession, or use of alcoholic beverages at specified times and places or by a particular class of persons, including prohibitions against drinking intoxicating beverages in specified public places; or

being upon the traveled portion of a highway so as to be a hazard to the motoring public.

Nothing in this chapter affects AS

11.81.630

, relating to the defense of voluntary intoxication.

History.

(§ 1 ch 207 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 186 SLA 1976)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

47.37.190

. Renumbered in 1972. In 1990, a reference to AS

11.81.630

was substituted for “former AS 11.70.030” in (b) of this section to reflect the repeal of the latter provision and enactment of substantially similar provisions in AS

11.81.630

by ch. 166, SLA 1978.

Sec. 47.37.260.
Application of Administrative Procedure Act.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) applies to and governs all administrative action taken by the department under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 207 SLA 1972; am E.O. No. 76 § 17 (1990); am E.O. No. 108 § 58 (2003))

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

47.37.200

. Renumbered in 1972.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2003 amendment, effective July 1, 2003, substituted “department” for “director.”

Sec. 47.37.270.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“alcoholic or drug abuser” means a person who demonstrates increased tolerance to alcohol or drugs, who suffers from withdrawal when alcohol or drugs are not available, whose habitual lack of self-control concerning the use of alcohol or drugs causes significant hazard to the person’s health, and who continues to use alcohol or drugs despite the adverse consequences;

“commissioner” means the commissioner of health and social services;

“department” means the Department of Health and Social Services;

“drugs” means a drug that is included in the controlled substance schedules set out in AS

11.71.140

—

11.71.190

;

“emergency service patrol” means a patrol established under AS

47.37.230

;

“hazardous volatile material or substance”

means a material or substance that is readily vaporizable at room temperature and whose vapors or gases, when inhaled,

pose an immediate threat to the life or health of the person; or

are likely to have adverse delayed effects on the health of the person;

includes, but is not limited to,

gasoline;

materials and substances containing petroleum distillates; and

common household materials and substances whose containers bear a notice warning that inhalation of vapors or gases may cause physical harm;

“incapacitated by alcohol or drugs” means a person who, as a result of alcohol or drugs, is unconscious or whose judgment is otherwise so impaired that the person (A) is incapable of realizing and making rational decisions with respect to the need for treatment and (B) is unable to take care of the person’s basic safety or personal needs, including food, clothing, shelter, or medical care;

“incompetent person” means a person who has been adjudged incompetent by the appropriate court;

“inhalant abuse” means the misuse of a hazardous volatile material or substance by inhaling its vapors;

“intoxicated person” means a person whose mental or physical functioning is substantially impaired as a result of the use of alcohol or drugs;

“treatment” means the broad range of emergency, outpatient, intermediate, and inpatient services and care that may be extended to alcoholics, intoxicated persons, or drug abusers, including diagnostic evaluation, medical, psychiatric, psychological, and social service care, vocational rehabilitation and career counseling;

“work therapy”

means an activity that involves a patient in basic employment skills and assists the patient in reintegration into a community;

does not include

activities such as personal housekeeping chores or cooperative responsibilities expected of each patient in the program; or

work that produces goods or services for sale or distribution, the proceeds of which would be returned to the owners, operators, or businesses of the rehabilitation program.

History.

(§ 1 ch 207 SLA 1972; am § 4 ch 116 SLA 1978; am §§ 15 — 18 ch 150 SLA 1980; am § 3 ch 58 SLA 1983; am § 69 ch 37 SLA 1986; am E.O. No. 71, § 23 (1988); am § 5 ch 75 SLA 1989; am E.O. No. 76 §§ 18 — 20 (1990); am §§ 16 — 20 ch 66 SLA 1996; am E.O. No. 108 §§ 59, 88 (2003); am § 51 ch 57 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

47.37.210

. Renumbered in 1972. Reorganized in 1983 to alphabetize the terms defined, and in 1989, 1990, and 2008 to maintain alphabetical order.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2003 amendment, effective July 1, 2003, substituted “department” for “division” in two places in paragraph (3) and repealed paragraphs (6) and (7).

The 2005 amendment, effective July 2, 2005, repealed paragraphs (2) and (3).